Utah statutes.
77-18-8.3.   Special condition of sentence during incarceration -- Penalty.
(1)  At the time of sentence, the court may order the defendant to be
prohibited from directly or indirectly engaging in any profit or benefit
generating activity relating to the publication of facts or circumstances
pertaining to the defendant’s involvement in the criminal act for which the
defendant is convicted.
(2)  The court's order may prohibit the defendant from contracting with any
person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, or other legal entity
with respect to the commission and reenactment of the defendant’s criminal
conduct, by way of a movie, book, magazine article, tape recording, phonograph
record, radio, or television presentations, live entertainment of any kind, or
from the expression of the defendant’s thoughts, feelings, opinions, or
emotions regarding the criminal conduct.
(3)  The court may order that the prohibition includes any event undertaken
and experienced by the defendant while avoiding apprehension from the
authorities or while facing criminal charges.
(4)  The court may order that any action taken by the defendant by way of
execution of power of attorney, creation of corporate entities, or other
action to avoid compliance with the court’s order may be found to be
contempt.
(5)  The Department of Corrections shall notify the attorney general of any
alleged violation of the court's order under this section.
(6)  The Board of Pardons and Parole and any county jail administrator may
consider the court’s finding in any incarceration release decision
concerning the incarcerated defendant.
(7)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "convicted" means a conviction by entry of a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, guilty and mentally ill, no contest, and conviction of any crime
or offense; and
(b)  "defendant" means the convicted defendant, the defendant's assignees, and
representatives acting on the defendant's authority.
